Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 39 Governmental Claims
§ 1-39-120.
Exclusions from waiver of immunity.

The liability imposed by W.S.

1-39-106

through

1-39-112

does not include liability for damages caused by:

A defect in the plan or design of any bridge, culvert, highway, roadway, street, alley, sidewalk or parking area;

The failure to construct or reconstruct any bridge, culvert, highway, roadway, street, alley, sidewalk or parking area; or

The maintenance, including maintenance to compensate for weather conditions, of any bridge, culvert, highway, roadway, street, alley, sidewalk or parking area.

Notwithstanding the waiver of immunity for tort liability provided by W.S.

1-39-105

through

1-39-112

or the waiver of immunity in actions based on contract provided by W.S.

1-39-104

, a governmental entity and its public employees while acting within the scope of duties are immune from a civil action in tort, contract or otherwise alleging, in whole or in part, the improper seizure of property pursuant to W.S.

35-7-1049

.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 89, § 1; 1991, ch. 34, § 1; 2016 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (b).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2016, ch. 1, § 2 state as follows: “This act shall apply to seizures of property which occur on or after July 1, 2016 and to any forfeitures proceedings related to property seized on or after July 1, 2016.”

Section constitutional. —

This section bears a reasonable relation to the legitimate legislative objectives of conserving public funds and preserving a fair and viable system of compensating persons injured by governmental actions. There is no constitutional infirmity. White v. State, 784 P.2d 1313,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1989).

Where a new prison policy prohibited prisoners from keeping certain personal property items in their cells, an inmate sued the Wyoming Department of Corrections (DOC) and claimed he had been denied equal protection of the law because the legislature did not include the DOC and the Wyoming State Penitentiary within the waiver of the rule of immunity; the Supreme Court of Wyoming rejected his claim, because the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act does not differentiate between inmates and non-inmates. The inmate's claim was subject to rational scrutiny; since the inmate sought tens of millions of dollars in compensation for more than a thousand separate pieces of property, excluding such losses from the beneficent purposes of the WGCA was rational and withstood the equal protection provisions of both the United States and the Wyoming constitutions.
Cosco v. Lampert, 2010 WY 52, 229 P.3d 962,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2010), cert. denied, 563 U.S. 910, 131 S. Ct. 1798, 179 L. Ed. 2d 666, 2011 U.S. LEXIS 2478 (U.S. 2011).

Waiver of immunity limited. —

The waiver of immunity in §

1-39-106

is limited by this section. Newberry v. Board of County Comm'rs, 919 P.2d 141,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1996).

Trestle is a “bridge.” —

A trestle on the railroad right-of-way is a bridge for purposes of the application of this section. Newberry v. Board of County Comm'rs, 919 P.2d 141,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1996).

There is no bar to liability

for operation of a motor vehicle, even if the motor vehicle is engaged in plowing snow on a roadway. Romero v. Hoppal, 855 P.2d 366,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1993).

State liable for negligent operation of motor vehicles. —

The legislature's subsequent amendment in 1991 of subsection (a)(iii) demonstrates it always intended the state not have immunity for accidents resulting from the negligent operation of motor vehicles, including snowplows. The word “maintenance” in subsection (a)(iii) is a noun and not a verb; it means that the maintenance is not the act of maintaining, but rather the result of any said act. Romero v. Hoppal, 855 P.2d 366,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1993).

No immunity for maintenance. —

Subsection (a)(iii), as it was in effect at the time of an accident, did not bar suit when the collision occurred while snowplow was in the process of maintaining a roadway to compensate for weather conditions. The word “maintenance” in subsection (a)(iii) is a noun and not a verb; it means that the maintenance is not the act of maintaining, but rather the result of any said act. Romero v. Hoppal, 855 P.2d 366,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1993).

Improper drainage system, causing damage, authorizes claim.
—

Where a plaintiff's property suffered damage in 1985, prior to the repeal of §

1-39-111

, as a result of the state's failure to properly construct or maintain a drainage system under a state highway, his claim was authorized by that section, and the court had jurisdiction to entertain the claim. Martinez v. City of Cheyenne, 791 P.2d 949,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1990), overruled, Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2004 WY 31, 86 P.3d 863,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2004).

Operation of public utilities. —

City did not provide a public service for which governmental immunity had been waived by §

1-39-108

when it provided a marked street crossing given the specific exclusion set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-39-120(a). Archer v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2018 WY 28, 413 P.3d 142,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2018).

Ramps or concourses at war memorial stadium are not “sidewalks.”

Rather, they are an integral part of the recreation area itself. DiVenere v. University of Wyoming, 811 P.2d 273,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

Shisler v. Town of Jackson, 890 P.2d 555,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1995); Fugle v. Sublette Cnty. Sch. Dist. #9, 2015 WY 98,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(July 31, 2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental tort liability as to highway median barriers, 58 ALR4th 559.

Governmental tort liability for injury to roller skater allegedly caused by sidewalk or street defects, 58 ALR4th 1197.

Reviewability before trial of order denying qualified immunity to defendant sued in state court under 42 USCS § 1983, 49 ALR5th 717.

Appealability, under collateral order doctrine, of order denying qualified immunity in 42 USC § 1983 or Bivens action for damages where claim for equitable relief is also pending — post-Harlow cases, 105 ALR Fed 851.

§ 1-39-121.
Granting
immunity for year 2000 computer date failures. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 157, § 1; 2010, ch. 27, § 2; repealed by 2017 ch. 41, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.